California statutes. Education Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 16.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22656.

No judgment or court order issued pursuant to this chapter is binding on the system with respect to the Defined Benefit Program or the Defined Benefit Supplement Program until the system has been joined as a party to the action and has been served with a certified copy of the judgment or court order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22657.

(a) The following provisions shall apply to a nonmember spouse as if he or she were a member under this part: Sections 22107, 22306, 22906, and 23802, subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 24600, and Sections 24601, 24602, 24603, 24605, 24606, 24607, 24608, 24611, 24612, 24613, 24616, 24617, 25009, 25010, 25011, 25011.1, 25013, 25020, 25021, and 25022.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section shall not be construed to establish any right for the nonmember spouse under
 this part that is not explicitly established in Sections 22650 to 22655, inclusive, and Sections 22658 to 22665, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 655, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22658.

(a) A separate account awarded to a nonmember spouse pursuant to Section 22652 shall be administered independently of the member’s account.

(b) An accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance, accumulated retirement contributions, service credit, and final compensation attributable to a separate account of a nonmember spouse under this part shall not be combined in any way or for any purpose with the accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance, accumulated
 retirement contributions, service credit, and final compensation of any other separate account of the nonmember spouse.

(c) An accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance, accumulated retirement contributions, service credit, and final compensation attributable to the separate account of a nonmember spouse shall not be combined in any way or for any purpose with the accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance, accumulated retirement contributions, service credit, and final compensation of an account that exists under this part because the nonmember spouse is employed or has been employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program or the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22659.

Upon being awarded a separate account or an interest in the retirement allowance or retirement benefit of a retired member under this part, a nonmember spouse shall provide the system with proof of his or her date of birth, social security number, and any other information requested by the system, in the form and manner requested by the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22660.

(a) The nonmember spouse who is awarded a separate account under this part shall have the right to designate, pursuant to Sections 23300 to 23304, inclusive, a beneficiary or beneficiaries to receive the accumulated retirement contributions under the Defined Benefit Program and to designate a payee to receive the remaining balance of payments for a period-certain annuity, or the accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program remaining in the separate account of the nonmember spouse on his or her date of death, and any accrued allowance or accrued benefit under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program that is attributable to the separate account of the
 nonmember spouse and that is unpaid on the date of the death of the nonmember spouse.

(b) This section shall not be construed to provide the nonmember spouse with any right to elect to modify a retirement allowance under Section 24300 or 24300.1, or to elect a joint and survivor annuity under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 3.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

22661.

(a) The nonmember spouse who is awarded a separate account under this part shall have the right to a refund of the accumulated retirement contributions in the account under the Defined Benefit Program, and a return of the Defined Benefit Supplement account balance, of the nonmember spouse under this part.

(b) The nonmember spouse shall file an application on a form provided by the system to obtain a refund or lump-sum payment.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (i), the refund of accumulated retirement contributions in the account under the Defined Benefit Program and the return of the accumulated Defined Benefit
 Supplement account balance under this part are effective when the system deposits in the United States mail an initial warrant drawn in favor of the nonmember spouse and addressed to the latest address for the nonmember spouse on file with the system.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (i), if the nonmember spouse has elected on a form provided by the system to transfer all or a specified portion of the accumulated retirement contributions or accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance that are eligible for direct trustee-to-trustee transfer to the trustee of a qualified plan under Section 402 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 402), deposit in the United States mail of a notice that the requested transfer has been made constitutes a refund of the nonmember spouse’s accumulated retirement contributions as
 defined in Section 22161.5 or the return of the accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance. This subdivision shall not apply to a nonmember domestic partner, consistent with Section 402 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(e) The nonmember spouse is deemed to have permanently waived all rights and benefits pertaining to the service credit, accumulated retirement contributions, and accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance under this part when the refund and lump-sum payment become effective.

(f) The nonmember spouse may not cancel a refund or lump-sum payment under this part after it is effective.

(g) The nonmember spouse shall not have a right to elect to redeposit the refunded accumulated
 retirement contributions under this part after the refund is effective, to redeposit under Section 22662 or purchase additional service credit under Section 22663 after the refund becomes effective, or to redeposit the accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance after the lump-sum payment becomes effective.

(h) If the total service credit in the separate account of the nonmember spouse under the Defined Benefit Program, including service credit purchased under Sections 22662 and 22663, is less than two and one-half years, the system shall refund the accumulated retirement contributions in the account.

(i) The mode of deposit described in subdivision (c) and the mode of notice described in subdivision (d) are subject to Section 22337.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 459, Sec. 3.   (AB 989)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

22662.

The nonmember spouse who is awarded a separate account under the Defined Benefit Program may redeposit accumulated retirement contributions previously refunded to the member in accordance with the determination of the court pursuant to Section 22652.

(a) The nonmember spouse may redeposit under the Defined Benefit Program only those accumulated retirement contributions that were previously refunded to the member and in which the court has determined the nonmember spouse has a community property interest.

(b) The nonmember spouse shall inform the system in writing of his or her intent to redeposit within 180 days after the judgment or
 court order that specifies the redeposit rights of the nonmember spouse is entered. Except as provided in subdivision (g), the nonmember spouse’s election to redeposit shall be made on a form provided by the system within 30 days after the system mails an election form and the billing.

(c) If the nonmember spouse elects to redeposit under the Defined Benefit Program, he or she shall repay all or a portion of the member’s refunded accumulated retirement contributions that were awarded to the nonmember spouse and shall pay regular interest from the date of the refund to the date payment of the redeposit is completed.

(d) All payments shall be received by the system before the effective date of the nonmember spouse’s retirement under this part. If any payment due because of the
 election is not received at the system’s headquarters office within 120 days of its due date, the election shall be canceled and any payments made under the election shall be returned to the nonmember spouse.

(e) The right of the nonmember spouse to redeposit shall be subject to Section 23203.

(f) The member shall not have a right to redeposit the share of the nonmember spouse in the previously refunded accumulated retirement contributions under this part whether or not the nonmember spouse elects to redeposit. However, any accumulated retirement contributions previously refunded under this part and not explicitly awarded to the nonmember spouse under this part by the judgment or court order shall be deemed the exclusive property of the member.

(g) The measurement of time within which the election to redeposit described in subdivision (b) shall be made is subject to Section 22337.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 17.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22663.

The nonmember spouse who is awarded a separate account under this part has the right to purchase additional service credit in accordance with the determination of the court pursuant to Section 22652.

(a) The nonmember spouse may purchase only the service credit that the court, pursuant to Section 22652, has determined to be the community property interest of the nonmember spouse.

(b) The nonmember spouse shall inform the system in writing of his or her intent to purchase additional service credit within 180 days after the date the judgment or court order addressing the right of the nonmember spouse to purchase additional service credit is entered.
 Except as provided in subdivision (f), the nonmember spouse shall elect to purchase additional service credit on a form provided by the system within 30 days after the system mails an election form and billing.

(c) If the nonmember spouse elects to purchase additional service credit, he or she shall pay, prior to retirement under this part, all contributions with respect to the additional service at the contribution rate for additional service credit in effect at the time of election and regular interest from July 1 of the year following the year upon which contributions are based.

(1) (A) The nonmember spouse shall purchase additional service credit by paying the required contributions and interest in one lump sum, or in not more than 120 monthly installments,
 provided that no installment, except the final installment, is less than twenty-five dollars ($25). Regular interest shall be charged on the monthly, unpaid balance if the nonmember spouse pays in installments.

(B) If any payment due, because of the election, is not received at the system’s headquarters office within 120 days of its due date, the election shall be canceled and any payments made under the election shall be returned to the nonmember spouse.

(2) The contributions shall be based on the member’s compensation earnable in the most recent school year during which the member was employed, preceding the date of separation established by the court pursuant to Section 22652.

(3) All payments of contributions
 and interest shall be received by the system before the effective date of the retirement of the nonmember spouse.

(d) The nonmember spouse does not have a right to purchase additional service credit under this part after the effective date of a refund of the accumulated retirement contributions in the separate account of the nonmember spouse.

(e) The member does not have a right to purchase the community property interest of the nonmember spouse of additional service credit under this part whether or not the nonmember spouse elects to purchase the additional service credit. However, any additional service credit eligible for purchase that is not explicitly awarded to the nonmember spouse by the judgment or court order shall be deemed the exclusive property of the member.

(f) The measurement of time within which the election to purchase additional service credit described in subdivision (b) shall be made is subject to Section 22337.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 18.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22664.

The nonmember spouse who is awarded a separate account shall have the right to a service retirement allowance and, if applicable, a retirement benefit under this part.

(a) The nonmember spouse shall be eligible to retire for service under this part if the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The member had at least five years of credited service during the period of marriage, at least one year of which had been performed subsequent to the most recent refund to the member of accumulated retirement contributions. The credited service may include service credited to the account of the member as of the date of the dissolution or legal separation, previously refunded service,
 out-of-state service, and permissive service credit that the member is eligible to purchase at the time of the dissolution or legal separation.

(2) The nonmember spouse has at least two and one-half years of credited service in his or her separate account.

(3) The nonmember spouse has attained 55 years of age or more.

(b) A service retirement allowance of a nonmember spouse under this part shall become effective upon a date designated by the nonmember spouse, provided:

(1) The requirements of subdivision (a) are satisfied.

(2) The nonmember spouse has filed an application for service retirement on a properly executed form provided by the system, that is executed no earlier than six months
 before the effective date of the retirement allowance.

(3) The effective date is no earlier than the first day of the month that the application is received at the system’s headquarters office and the effective date is after the date the judgment or court order pursuant to Section 22652 was entered.

(c) (1) Upon service retirement at normal retirement age under this part, the nonmember spouse shall receive a retirement allowance that shall consist of an annual allowance payable in monthly installments equal to 2 percent of final compensation for each year of credited service.

(2) If the nonmember spouse’s retirement is effective at less than normal retirement age and between early retirement age under this part and normal retirement age, the retirement allowance shall be reduced by one-half of 1
 percent for each full month, or fraction of a month, that will elapse until the nonmember spouse would have reached normal retirement age.

(3) If the nonmember spouse’s service retirement is effective at an age greater than normal retirement age and is effective on or after January 1, 1999, the percentage of final compensation for each year of credited service shall be determined pursuant to the following table:Age at RetirementPercentage60¼ 2.03360½ 2.06760¾ 2.1061 2.13361¼ 2.16761½ 2.2061¾ 2.23362 2.26762¼ 2.3062½ 2.33362¾ 2.36763 and over 2.40(4) In computing the retirement allowance of the nonmember spouse, the age of the nonmember spouse on the last day of the month that the retirement allowance begins to accrue shall be used.

(5) Final compensation, for purposes of calculating the service retirement allowance of the nonmember spouse under this subdivision, shall be calculated according to the definition of final compensation in Section 22134, 22134.5, or 22135, whichever is applicable, and shall be based on the member’s compensation earnable up to the date the parties separated, as established in the judgment or court order pursuant to Section 22652. The nonmember spouse shall not be entitled to use any other calculation of final compensation.

(d) Upon service retirement under this part, the nonmember spouse shall receive a retirement benefit based on an
 amount equal to the balance of credits in the nonmember spouse’s Defined Benefit Supplement account on the date the retirement benefit becomes payable.

(1) A retirement benefit shall be a lump-sum payment, or an annuity payable in monthly installments, or a combination of both a lump-sum payment and an annuity, as elected by the nonmember spouse on the application for a retirement benefit. A retirement benefit paid as an annuity under this chapter shall be subject to Sections 22660, 25011, and 25011.1.

(2) Upon distribution of the entire retirement benefit in a lump-sum payment, no other benefit shall be payable to the nonmember spouse or the nonmember spouse’s beneficiary under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(e) If the member is or was receiving a disability allowance under this part with an effective date
 before or on the date the parties separated as established in the judgment or court order pursuant to Section 22652, or at any time applies for and receives a disability allowance with an effective date that is before or coincides with the date the parties separated as established in the judgment or court order pursuant to Section 22652, the nonmember spouse shall not be eligible to retire until after the disability allowance of the member terminates. If the member who is or was receiving a disability allowance returns to employment to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program or has his or her allowance terminated under Section 24015, the nonmember spouse may not be paid a retirement allowance until at least six months after termination of the disability allowance and the return of the member to employment to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program, or the termination of the disability allowance and the employment or
 self-employment of the member in any capacity, notwithstanding Section 22132. If at the end of the six-month period, the member has not had a recurrence of the original disability or has not had his or her earnings fall below the amounts described in Section 24015, the nonmember spouse may be paid a retirement allowance if all other eligibility requirements are met.

(1) The retirement allowance of the nonmember spouse under this subdivision shall be calculated as follows: the disability allowance the member was receiving, exclusive of the portion for dependent children, shall be divided between the share of the member and the share of the nonmember spouse. The share of the nonmember spouse shall be the amount obtained by multiplying the disability allowance, exclusive of the portion for dependent children, by the years of service credited to the separate account of the nonmember spouse, including service projected to the date of separation, and
 dividing by the projected service of the member. The nonmember spouse’s retirement allowance shall be the lesser of the share of the nonmember spouse under this subdivision or the retirement allowance under subdivision (c).

(2) The share of the member shall be the total disability allowance reduced by the share of the nonmember spouse. The share of the member shall be considered the disability allowance of the member for purposes of Section 24213.

(f) The nonmember spouse who receives a retirement allowance is not a retired member under this part. However, the allowance of the nonmember spouse shall be increased by application of the improvement factor and shall be eligible for the application of supplemental increases and other benefit maintenance provisions under this part, including, but not limited to, Sections 24412 and 24415 based on the same criteria used for the
 application of these benefit maintenance increases to the service retirement allowances of members.

(g) Paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (c) shall not apply to a nonmember spouse of a member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013. For a person who is a nonmember spouse of a member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013 and is awarded a separate account, the retirement allowance shall equal the percentage of final compensation for each year of credited service that is equal to the percentage specified in Section 24202.6 based on the age of the nonmember spouse on the effective date of the allowance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 15.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22665.

The system shall include the service credit awarded to a nonmember spouse in the judgment or court order to determine the eligibility of a member for a retirement or disability allowance under this part. That portion of awarded service credit based on previously refunded accumulated retirement contributions or on permissive service credit may not be used by the member for eligibility requirements until the member has redeposited or purchased his or her portion of the service credit. The member’s service retirement allowance shall be calculated based on the service
 credit in the member’s account on the effective date of service retirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22666.

It is the intent of the Legislature to abolish any remaining application of the terminable interest doctrine in California relating to the division of public retirement benefits of a member in the event of dissolution of marriage or death if the division is made under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Service Credit [22700. - 22724.]

22700.

This chapter governs the computation of service to be credited under this part to a member of the Defined Benefit Program for the purpose of determining eligibility for benefits under the program, the amount of contributions required of the member in the program, and the amount of benefits paid to a retired member under the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22701.

(a) Service performed prior to July 1, 1972, shall be credited according to the provisions of law in effect at the time service was performed.

(b) Creditable service performed on or after July 1, 1972, and credited under the Defined Benefit Program, shall be credited in the proportion that the member’s salary or wages, as described in Section 22119.2 or 22119.3, for that service bears to the member’s annualized pay rate.

(c) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board
 shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1, 2027.

(2) This section shall become inoperative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1), and this section shall be repealed on July 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 19.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 20 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 690.)
-------------------------------------------

22701.

(a) Service performed prior to July 1, 1972, shall be credited according to the provisions of law in effect at the time service was performed.

(b) Service performed on or after July 1, 1972, and credited under the Defined Benefit Program, shall be credited in the proportion that the member’s salary or wages, as described in Section 22119.2 or 22119.3, as those sections read prior to the operative date of the act adding this section, for that service bears to the member’s annualized pay rate.

(c) Service performed on or after the operative date of the act adding this section shall be credited as determined
 using the sum of the following, not to exceed one year in any given school year:

(1) The quotient obtained when all salary, as described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 22119.3, is divided by the annualized pay rate of the applicable salary.

(2) The quotient obtained when all supplemental pay, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 22119.3, is divided by the compensation earnable for the applicable school year.

(d) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the
 internet website of the system no later than July 1, 2027.

(2) This section shall become operative on the date determined
 by the board pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 19) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 20.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22703.

(a) Service shall be credited to the Defined Benefit Program, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) A member’s creditable service that exceeds 1.000 in a school year shall not be credited to the Defined Benefit Program. Commencing July 1, 2002, contributions by the employer and the member that are deposited in the Teachers’ Retirement Fund for creditable compensation paid to the member for service that exceeds 1.000 in a school year, exclusive of contributions pursuant to Sections 22901.7, 22950.5, and 22951, shall be credited to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(c) In lieu of any other benefits provided by
 this part, any member who performed service prior to July 1, 1956, shall receive retirement benefits for that service at least equal to the benefits that the member would have received for that service under the provisions of this part as they existed on June 30, 1956. This subdivision shall not apply to service that is credited in the San Francisco Employees’ Retirement System.

(d) The amendments to this section made during the second year of the 1999–2000 Regular Session shall become operative on July 1, 2002, if the revenue limit cost-of-living adjustment computed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction for the 2001–02 fiscal year is equal to or greater than 3.5 percent. Otherwise the amendments to this section made during the second year of the 1999–2000 Regular Session shall become operative on July 1, 2003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 16.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22704.

In any school district that is conducting a year-round school operation or a continuous school program, service shall be credited to the school year in which the service began.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22705.

No service shall be included under this part for which a member of the Defined Benefit Program is entitled to receive a retirement benefit in a lump sum or installment payments, for other than military service, from any public retirement system other than this system, or under the American Gratuity Act No. 4151 relating to service in the Philippine Islands under which 15 or more years of creditable service has accrued, or the San Francisco Employees’ Retirement System. If a retired member under this part becomes entitled to that retirement benefit, his or her retirement allowance shall be reduced thereafter to exclude the service upon which the retirement benefit is based, without other change in his or her retirement status. This section shall not apply to any retirement benefit received from a defined contribution plan that is qualified under Section 401(a), Section 403(b), or Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 351, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

22705.5.

Service subject to coverage by the San Francisco Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to Section 24701 is excluded from coverage in the Defined Benefit Program. The member shall retain the right to receive a retirement allowance for creditable service that is subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program unless he or she withdraws his or her accumulated retirement contributions for that service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 351, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

22706.

A member shall not receive credit for service performed while receiving a retirement or disability allowance under the Defined Benefit Program or while receiving a retirement or disability benefit under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22708.

(a) The calculations of retirement allowances under this part for state employees in the personal leave program shall include credit for service that would have been credited had the employee not been in the personal leave program. The costs that result from the increased service credit shall be paid for by the employer in a manner prescribed by the system.

(b) The calculations of a retirement allowance under this part for a state employee subject to mandatory furloughs shall include earnings, contributions, and annualized pay rates that would have been reported had the employee not been subject to mandatory furloughs. The employer shall pay the cost of the increased service
 credit that results from these inclusions in a manner prescribed by the system pursuant to Section 22909.

(c) For purposes of subdivision (b), “mandatory furloughs” means time during which a member identified below is directed to be absent from work without pay because of an Executive order in the 2008–09 and 2009–10 fiscal years:

(1) A person subject to an Executive order requiring a mandatory furlough for state employees.

(2) A person who is excepted from the definition of “state employee” in subdivision (c) of Section 3513, or who is an officer or employee of the executive branch of state government who is not a member of the civil service, and who is subject to an Executive order requiring a mandatory furlough for state employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 96, Sec. 13.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22709.

A member shall receive credit under this part for time during which the member is prevented from performing creditable service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program, by act of God, or by reason of the closing of a school by any duly authorized officer or body. If by reason of a member’s Japanese ancestry, the member was required by the Wartime Civil Control Administration to leave his or her teaching position in California and returned prior to July 1, 1972, to service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program, the system shall give the member four years of service credit under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 80.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22710.

(a) Service shall be credited under this part, upon payment of the contributions required under Sections 22901 and 22950, for that time during which a member is excused from performance of creditable service and for which the member receives workers’ compensation, or compensation from an insurance carrier of the employer, due to injury or illness that arose out of and in the course of the member’s employment.

(b) Service credited pursuant to this section shall be credited in the proportion that the compensation paid to the member bears to the member’s annualized pay rate.

(c) The amount of compensation
 used to credit service pursuant to this section shall not exceed what the member’s annualized pay rate would have been but for the period of absence specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 96, Sec. 14.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22711.

An elected officer of an employee organization that is on a compensated leave of absence pursuant to Section 44987 or 87768.5 shall be entitled to the service credit, compensation earnable, interest, and additional earnings credits under this part that they otherwise would have been due had the member not been on the compensated leave of absence, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The member was employed and performed creditable service subject to coverage under this Defined Benefit Program in the month before commencement of the leave of absence.

(b) The member makes contributions to the Teachers’ Retirement Fund in the amount that
 the member would have contributed had the member performed creditable service during the period the member served as an elected officer of the employee organization.

(c) The member’s employer contributes to the Teachers’ Retirement Fund at a rate adopted by the board as a plan amendment with respect to the Defined Benefit Program an amount based upon the creditable compensation that would have been paid to the member had the member performed creditable service during the period the member served as an elected officer of the employee organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 539, Sec. 1.   (SB 294)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

22712.

A member under this part shall receive credit for time served as an exchange teacher in any location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 83.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22712.5.

All members under this part who are employed by a school district, community college district, or superintendent of schools and who received credit during the school year ending June 30, 1996, for service performed as a community service teacher or in a classified position that does not qualify for membership in the Public Employees’ Retirement System, shall continue to receive credit for that service performed after June 30, 1996, provided the member remains continuously employed to perform that service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22713.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if the governing board of a school district or a community college district, or a county superintendent of schools establishes regulations pursuant to Sections 44922 and 87483, an employer may enter into a written agreement with an employee who is a member of the Defined Benefit Program to reduce their workload in a position from full time to part time, receive the service credit the member would have received if the member had been employed in that position on a full-time basis and have their retirement allowance, as well as other benefits that the member is entitled to under this part, based, in part, on the final compensation the member would have been entitled to if the member had
 been employed on a full-time basis. The option to reduce the member’s workload shall be exercised at the request of the member if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The member is employed by either of the following:

(A) A school district or county office of education as a prekindergarten through grade 12 certificated employee who does not hold a position with a salary above the maximum salary of a school principal for that employer.

(B) A community college district.

(2) The member has a minimum of 10 years of credited service in the Defined Benefit Program prior to the start of the school term of the first school year of the agreement to reduce the
 member’s workload.

(3) The member shall have been employed on a full-time basis to perform creditable service under the Defined Benefit Program each year of the five school years immediately preceding the first school year in which the member’s workload is reduced, without having a break in service. For the purposes of this paragraph:

(A) Employer-approved leaves of absence, and unpaid absences from the performance of creditable service for personal reasons from full-time employment do not constitute a break in service.

(B) Creditable service that was performed for a school year in which a member reduced their workload pursuant to this section shall be treated as full time, provided that the agreement to reduce the
 member’s workload was not terminated during that year pursuant to subdivision (e).

(C) The period of time during which a member is retired for service shall constitute a break in service.

(4) The member is 55 years of age or older prior to the start of the school term of the first school year of the agreement for which the member’s workload is reduced.

(b) The employer, in conjunction with the system, shall certify the member’s eligibility for participation in the reduced workload program in accordance with subdivision (a). The employer’s certification shall be submitted in a format prescribed by the system and shall be received in the system’s headquarters office prior to the start of the school term of the first
 school year of the agreement for which the member’s workload is reduced.

(c) The agreement to reduce the member’s workload shall be in effect prior to the start of the school term of the first school year of the agreement for which the member’s workload is reduced, and shall include the following requirements:

(1) The total amount of time in which a member reduces their workload pursuant to this section shall not exceed 10 school years.

(2) The reduced workload shall be equal to at least one-half of the time the employer requires for full-time employment in that position in accordance with Section 22138.5.

(3) The member shall be paid creditable compensation that is the
 pro rata share of the creditable compensation the member would have been paid for that position had the member not reduced their workload.

(4) For each school year the member’s workload is reduced pursuant to this section, the member shall make contributions to the Teachers’ Retirement Fund in the amount that the member would have contributed if the member had performed creditable service for that position on a full-time basis and if that service was subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program.

(5) For each school year the member’s workload is reduced pursuant to this section, the employer shall contribute to the Teachers’ Retirement Fund at a rate adopted by the board as a plan amendment with respect to the Defined Benefit Program an amount based upon the creditable
 compensation that would have been paid to the member if the member had performed creditable service for that position on a full-time basis and if that service was subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program.
